Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
General Provisions
§ 71-3-17.
Compensation for disability.

Compensation for disability shall be paid to the employee as follows:

Permanent total disability: In case of total disability adjudged to be permanent, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average weekly wages of the injured employee, subject to the maximum limitations as to weekly benefits as set up in this chapter, shall be paid to the employee not to exceed four hundred fifty (450) weeks or an amount greater than the multiple of four hundred fifty (450) weeks times sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average weekly wage for the state. Loss of both hands, or both arms, or both feet, or both legs, or both eyes, or of any two (2) thereof shall constitute permanent total disability. In all other cases, permanent total disability shall be determined in accordance with the facts.

Temporary total disability: In case of disability, total in character but temporary in quality, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average weekly wages of the injured employee, subject to the maximum limitations as to weekly benefits as set up in this chapter, shall be paid to the employee during the continuance of such disability not to exceed four hundred fifty (450) weeks or an amount greater than the multiple of four hundred fifty (450) weeks times sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average weekly wage for the state. Provided, however, if there arises a conflict in medical opinions of whether or not the claimant has reached maximum medical recovery and the claimant’s benefits have been terminated by the carrier, then the claimant may demand an immediate hearing before the commissioner upon five (5) days’ notice to the carrier for a determination by the commission of whether or not in fact the claimant has reached maximum recovery.

Permanent partial disability: In case of disability partial in character but permanent in quality, the compensation shall be sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average weekly wages of the injured employee, subject to the maximum limitations as to weekly benefits as set up in this chapter, which shall be paid following compensation for temporary total disability paid in accordance with paragraph (b) of this section, and shall be paid to the employee as follows:

Member Lost Number Weeks Compensation (1) Arm 200 (2) Leg 175 (3) Hand 150 (4) Foot 125 (5) Eye 100 (6) Thumb
60 (7) First finger
35 (8) Great toe
30 (9) Second finger
30 (10) Third finger
20 (11) Toe other than great toe
10 (12) Fourth finger
15 (13) Testicle, one
50 (14) Testicle, both 150 (15) Breast, female, one
50 (16) Breast, female, both 150

Click to view

Loss of hearing:Compensation for loss of hearing of one (1) ear, forty (40) weeks.Compensation for loss of hearing of both ears, one hundred fifty (150)weeks.

Phalanges: Compensationfor loss of more than one (1) phalange of a digit shall be the sameas for loss of the entire digit. Compensation for loss of the firstphalange shall be one-half (1/2) of the compensation for loss ofthe entire digit.

Amputated armor leg: Compensation for an arm or leg, if amputated at or above wristor ankle, shall be for the loss of the arm or leg.

Binocular visionor percent of vision: Compensation for loss of binocular vision orfor eighty percent (80%) or more of the vision of an eye shall bethe same as for loss of the eye.

Two (2) or moredigits: Compensation for loss of two (2) or more digits, or one (1)or more phalanges of two (2) or more digits, of a hand or foot maybe proportioned to the loss of the use of the hand or foot occasionedthereby, but shall not exceed the compensation for loss of a handor foot.

Total loss ofuse: Compensation for permanent total loss of use of a member shallbe the same as for loss of the member.

Partial lossor partial loss of use: Compensation for permanent partial loss orloss of use of a member may be for proportionate loss or loss of useof the member.

Disfigurement:The commission, in its discretion, is authorized to award proper andequitable compensation for serious facial or head disfigurements notto exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). No such award shall bemade until a lapse of one (1) year from the date of the injury resultingin such disfigurement.

Other cases:In all other cases in this class of disability, the compensation shallbe sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the differencebetween his average weekly wages, subject to the maximum limitationsas to weekly benefits as set up in this chapter, and his wage-earningcapacity thereafter in the same employment or otherwise, payable duringthe continuance of such partial disability, but subject to reconsiderationof the degree of such impairment by the commission on its own motionor upon application of any party in interest. Such payments shallin no case be made for a longer period than four hundred fifty (450)weeks.

In any case inwhich there shall be a loss of, or loss of use of, more than one (1)member or parts of more than one (1) member set forth in subparagraphs(1) through (23) of this paragraph (c), not amounting to permanenttotal disability, the award of compensation shall be for the lossof, or loss of use of, each such member or parts thereof, which awardsshall run consecutively, except that where the injury affects onlytwo (2) or more digits of the same hand or foot, subparagraph (21)of this paragraph (c) shall apply.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-09; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 8a-c; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 6; Laws, 1958, ch. 454, § 3; Laws, 1968, ch. 559, § 5; Laws, 1972, ch. 522, § 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 459, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 442, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 341, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 9; Laws, 1984, ch. 402, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 446, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 9; Laws, 2012, ch. 522, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 71-3-19.
Maintenance while undergoing vocational rehabilitation.

An employee who as a result of injury is or may be expected to be totally or partially incapacitated for a remunerative occupation and who, under the direction of the commission is being rendered fit to engage in a remunerative occupation may, in the discretion of the commission under regulations adopted by it, receive additional compensation necessary for his maintenance, but such additional compensation shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) a week for not more than fifty-two (52) weeks.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-10; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 8d; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 6; Laws, 1958, ch. 454, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, 1980 ch 473, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 10; Laws, 2012, ch. 522, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 71-3-21.
Temporary partial disability.

In case of temporary partial disability resulting in decrease of earning capacity, there shall be paid to the injured employee sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the difference between the injured employee’s average weekly wages before the injury and his wage-earning capacity after the injury in the same or other employment, subject to the maximum limitations as to weekly benefits as set up in this chapter, payable during the continuance of such disability but in no case exceeding four hundred fifty (450) weeks or an amount greater than the multiple of four hundred fifty (450) weeks times sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average weekly wage for the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-11; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 8e; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 6; Laws, 1958, ch. 454, § 3; Laws, 1968, ch. 559, § 6; Laws, 1972, ch. 522, § 4; Laws, 1976, ch. 459, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 442, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 341, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 11; Laws, 1984, ch. 402, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 446, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-23.
Hernia.

In all cases of claim for hernia, it shall be shown by a preponderance of the evidence:

That the descent or protrusion of the hernia or rupture immediately followed as the result of sudden effort, severe strain, or the application of force to the abdominal wall;

That there was severe pain in the region of the hernia or rupture;

That there has been no descent or protrusion of the hernia or rupture prior to the accident for which compensation is claimed;

That the physical distress resulting from the descent or protrusion of the hernia or rupture was noticed immediately by claimant, and communicated to his employer within a reasonable time; and

That the physical distress following the descent or protrusion of the hernia or rupture was such as to require the attendance of a licensed physician or surgeon within five (5) days after the injury for which compensation is claimed. Postoperative hernias shall be considered as original hernias.

In every case of hernia or rupture as above defined, it shall be the duty of the employer forthwith to provide the necessary and proper medical, surgical, and hospital care and attention to effectuate a cure by radical operation of said hernia or rupture, and to pay compensation under the provisions of paragraph (b) of Section 71-3-17, not exceeding, however, a period of twenty-six (26) weeks.

In case the employee shall refuse to permit such operation, it shall be the duty of the employer to provide all necessary first aid, medical and hospital care and services, to supply the proper and necessary truss or other mechanical appliance to enable said employee to resume work, and shall further pay compensation under the provisions of paragraph (b) of Section 71-3-17, not exceeding, however, the period of thirteen (13) weeks.

In case death results within a period of one (1) year, either from the hernia or rupture or from the radical operation thereof, compensation shall be paid the dependents as provided in other death cases under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-12; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 8f; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 6; Laws, 1958, ch. 454, § 3; Laws, 1960, ch. 280; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-25.
Compensation for death.

If the injury causes death, the compensation shall be known as a death benefit and shall be payable in the amount and to or for the benefit of the persons following:

An immediate lump-sum payment of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) to the surviving spouse, in addition to other compensation benefits.

Reasonable funeral expenses not exceeding Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) exclusive of other burial insurance or benefits.

If there be a surviving spouse and no child of the deceased, to such surviving spouse thirty-five percent (35%) of the average wages of the deceased during widowhood or dependent widowhood and, if there be a surviving child or children of the deceased, the additional amount of ten percent (10%) of such wages for each such child. In case of the death or remarriage of such surviving spouse, any surviving child of the deceased employee shall have his compensation increased to fifteen percent (15%) of such wages, provided that the total amount payable shall in no case exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of such wages, subject to the maximum limitations as to weekly benefits as set up in this chapter. The commission may, in its discretion, require the appointment of a guardian for the purpose of receiving the compensation of a minor dependent. In the absence of such a requirement, the appointment of a guardian for such purposes shall not be necessary, provided that if no legal guardian be appointed, payment to the natural guardian shall be sufficient.

If there be a surviving child or children of the deceased but no surviving spouse, then for the support of each such child twenty-five percent (25%) of the wages of the deceased, provided that the aggregate shall in no case exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of such wages, subject to the maximum limitations as to weekly benefits as set up in this chapter.

If there be no surviving spouse or child, or if the amount payable to a surviving spouse and to children shall be less in the aggregate than sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average wages of the deceased, subject to the maximum limitations as to weekly benefits as set up in this chapter, then for the support of grandchildren or brothers and sisters, if dependent upon the deceased at the time of the injury, fifteen percent (15%) of such wages for the support of each such person; and for the support of each parent or grandparent of the deceased, if dependent upon him at the time of injury, fifteen percent (15%) of such wages during such dependency. But in no case shall the aggregate amount payable under this subsection exceed the difference between sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of such wages and the amount payable as hereinbefore provided to surviving spouse and for the support of surviving child or children, subject to the maximum limitations as to weekly benefits as set up in this chapter.

The total weekly compensation payments to any or all beneficiaries in death cases shall not exceed the weekly benefits as set up in this chapter and shall in no case be paid for a longer period than four hundred fifty (450) weeks or for a greater amount than the multiple of four hundred fifty (450) weeks times sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average weekly wage for the state.

All questions of dependency shall be determined as of the time of the injury. A surviving spouse, child or children shall be presumed to be wholly dependent. All other dependents shall be considered on the basis of total or partial dependence as the facts may warrant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-13; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 9; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 7; Laws, 1958, ch. 454, § 4; Laws, 1968, ch. 559, § 7; Laws, 1972, ch. 522, § 5; Laws, 1976, ch. 459, § 4; Laws, 1979, ch. 442, § 4; Laws, 1981, ch. 341, § 4; reenacted by Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 13; Laws, 1984, ch. 402, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 499, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 446, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 13; Laws, 2012, ch. 522, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 71-3-27.
Aliens.

Compensation under this chapter to aliens not residents (or about to become nonresidents) of the United States or Canada shall be in the same amount as provided for residents, except that dependents in any foreign country shall be limited to surviving wife and child or children or, if there be no surviving wife or child or children, to surviving father or mother whom the employee has supported, either wholly or in part, for the period of one (1) year prior to the date of the injury, and except that the commission may, at its option or upon the application of the insurance carrier, commute all future installments of compensation to be paid to such aliens by payment of a lump sum equal to the present value of all future payments of compensation computed at four percent (4%) discount compounded annually.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 6998-13, 6998-14; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, §§ 9, 9h; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 7; Laws, 1958, ch. 454, § 4; Laws, 1968, ch. 559, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-29.
Compromise, commutation, and lump sum payments.

Rules of the commission shall govern compromise payments where the prescribed schedules are not applicable and which, in its discretion, may be made in cases where it is not possible to determine the exact extent of disability, as for example in certain injuries to the back or head. The commission shall also have full authority to adjudicate the disposition of death claims. Commutation and lump sum settlement payments shall be governed by rules of the commission, and shall not be made except when determined to be in the best interest of the injured worker or his dependents, the commission having final authority in such questions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 6998-13, 6998-15; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, §§ 9, 9i; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 7; Laws, 1958, ch. 454, § 4; Laws, 1968, ch. 559, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-31.
Determination of wages.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the basis for compensation under this chapter shall be the average weekly wages earned by the employee at the time of the injury, such wages to be determined from the earnings of the injured employee in the employment in which he was working at the time of the injury during the period of fifty-two (52) weeks immediately preceding the date of the injury divided by fifty-two (52); but if the injured employee lost more than seven (7) days during such period, although not in the same week, then the earnings for the remainder of such fifty-two (52) weeks shall be divided by the number of weeks remaining after the time so lost has been deducted. When the employment prior to the injury extended over a period of less than fifty-two (52) weeks, the method of dividing the earnings during that period by the number of weeks and parts thereof during which the employee earned wages shall be followed, provided that results just and fair to both parties will thereby be obtained. Where, by reason of the shortness of time during which the employee has been in the employment of his employer, it is impracticable to compute the average weekly wages by the above method of computation, regard shall be had to the average weekly amount which, during the first fifty-two (52) weeks prior to the injury or death, was being earned by a person in the same grade, employed at the same or similar work in the community. Wherever allowances of any character are made to an employee in lieu of wages or specified as part of the wage contract, they shall be deemed a part of his earnings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-16; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-33.
Guardian for minor or incompetent.

The commission may require the appointment by a court of competent jurisdiction, for any person who is mentally incompetent or a minor, of a guardian or other representative to receive compensation payable to such person under this chapter and to exercise the powers granted to or to perform the duties required of such person under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-17; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-35.
Limitation.

No claim for compensation shall be maintained unless, within thirty (30) days after the occurrence of the injury, actual notice was received by the employer or by an officer, manager, or designated representative of an employer. If no representative has been designated by posters placed in one or more conspicuous places, then notice received by any superior shall be sufficient. Absence of notice shall not bar recovery if it is found that the employer had knowledge of the injury and was not prejudiced by the employee’s failure to give notice. Regardless of whether notice was received, if no payment of compensation (other than medical treatment or burial expense) is made and no application for benefits filed with the commission within two (2) years from the date of the injury or death, the right to compensation therefor shall be barred.

If a person who is entitled to compensation under this chapter is mentally incompetent or a minor, the limitation for filing application for benefits shall not be applicable so long as such person has no guardian or other authorized representative, but shall be applicable in the case of a person who is mentally incompetent or a minor from the date of appointment of such guardian or other representative, or in the case of a minor, if no guardian is appointed before he becomes of age, from the date he becomes of age.

Where recovery is denied to any person, in a suit brought at law or admiralty to recover damages in respect of injury or death, on the ground that such person was an employee and that the defendant was an employer within the meaning of this chapter and that such employer had secured compensation to such employee under this chapter, the limitation upon filing application for benefits shall begin to run only from the date of termination of such suit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-18; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-37.
Payment of compensation.

Compensation under this chapter shall be paid periodically, promptly, in the usual manner, and directly to the person entitled thereto, without an award except where liability to pay compensation is controverted by the employer.

The first installment of compensation shall become due on the fourteenth (14th) day after the employer has notice, as provided in Section 71-3-35, of the injury or death, on which date all compensation then due shall be paid. Thereafter, compensation shall be paid in installments, every fourteen (14) days, except where the commission determines that payment in installments should be made at some other period.

Upon making the first payment and upon suspension of payment for any cause, the employer shall immediately notify the commission in accordance with a form prescribed by the commission that payment of compensation has begun or has been suspended, as the case may be. No suspension in payments of compensation shall be made for refusing to submit to medical or surgical treatment until the reasonableness of such request or refusal has been determined by the commission, and a written order suspending payment issued.

If the employer controverts the right to compensation he shall file with the commission, on or before the fourteenth (14th) day after he has knowledge of the alleged injury or death, a notice in accordance with a form prescribed by the commission, stating that the right to compensation is controverted, the name of the claimant, the name of the employer, the date of the alleged injury or death, and the grounds upon which the right to compensation is controverted. Failure to file this notice shall not prevent the employer raising any defense where claim is subsequently filed by the employee, nor shall the filing of the notice preclude the employer raising any additional defense.

If any installment of compensation payable without an award is not paid within fourteen (14) days after it becomes due, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, there shall be added to such unpaid installment an amount equal to ten percent (10%) thereof, which shall be paid at the same time as, but in addition to, such installment unless notice is filed under subsection (4) of this section, or unless such nonpayment is excused by the commission after a showing by the employer that owing to conditions over which he had no control such installment could not be paid within the period prescribed for the payment.

If any installment payable under the terms of an award is not paid within fourteen (14) days after it becomes due, there shall be added to such unpaid installment an amount equal to twenty percent (20%) thereof, which shall be paid at the same time as, but in addition to, such compensation unless review of the compensation order making such award is had.

Within thirty (30) days after the final payment of compensation has been made, the employer shall send to the commission a notice in accordance with a form prescribed by the commission, stating that such final payment has been made, the total amount of compensation paid, the name of the employee and of any other person to whom compensation has been paid, the date of the injury or death, and the date to which compensation has been paid. If the employer fails so to notify the commission within such time, the commission may assess against such employer a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). No case shall be closed nor any penalty be assessed without notice to all parties interested and without giving to all such parties an opportunity to be heard.

The commission (a) may upon its own initiative at any time in a case in which payments are being made without an award, and (b) shall in any case where right to compensation is controverted or where payments of compensation have been stopped or suspended, upon receipt of notice from any person entitled to compensation or from the employer that the right to compensation is controverted or that payments of compensation have been stopped or suspended, make such investigations, cause such medical examinations to be made, hold such hearings, and take such further action as it considers will properly protect the rights of all parties.

Whenever the commission deems it advisable, it may require any self-insurer to make a deposit with the State Treasurer to secure prompt and convenient payment of such compensation; and payments therefrom upon any awards shall be made upon order of the commission.

Whenever the commission determines that it is for the best interests of a person entitled to compensation, the liability of the employer for compensation, or any part thereof as determined by the commission, may be discharged by the payment of a lump sum equal to the present value of future compensation payments commuted, computed at four percent (4%) true discount compounded annually. The probability of the death of the injured employee or other person entitled to compensation shall be determined in accordance with validated actuarial tables or factors as the commission finds equitable and consistent with the purposes of the Workers’ Compensation Law, and the probability of the remarriage of the surviving spouse or other person entitled to compensation may be determined in accordance with rules adopted by the commission which shall apply validated actuarial tables or factors as the commission finds equitable and consistent with the purposes of the Workers’ Compensation Law. The probability of the happening of any other contingency affecting the amount or duration of the compensation shall be disregarded. The commission shall be the sole judge as to whether or not a lump-sum payment shall be to the best interest of the injured worker or his dependents.

If the employer has made advance payments of compensation, he shall be entitled to be reimbursed out of any unpaid installment or installments of compensation due.

An injured employee or, in case of death, his dependents or personal representative shall give receipts for payment of compensation to the employer paying the same; and whenever required, such employer shall produce the same for inspection by the commission.

Whenever a dispute arises between two (2) or more parties as to which party is liable for the payment of workers’ compensation benefits to an injured employee and there is no genuine issue of material fact as to the employee’s employment, his average weekly wage, the occurrence of an injury, the extent of the injury, and the fact that the injury arose out of and in the course of the employment, the commission may require the disputing parties involved to pay benefits immediately to the employee and to share equally in the payment of those benefits until it is determined which party is solely liable, at which time the liable party must reimburse all other parties for the benefits they have paid to the employee with interest at the legal rate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-19; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 13; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 19; Laws, 1987, ch. 361, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 19; Laws, 1992, ch. 577, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 349, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 15, 2007.).

§ 71-3-38.
Special workers’ compensation account for payment.

While acting as a self-insurer as authorized by Section 71-3-5, the state highway commission is authorized and empowered to establish and maintain, from funds made available upon requisition from the state treasury, a special workmen’s compensation account, and to deposit such funds therein, and to pay therefrom the workmen’s compensation benefits as authorized by Section 71-3-37, and to pay such awards as may be entered and such other costs, expenses and benefits as may be incidental to the settlement of such workmen’s compensation claims. Disbursement from such special account shall be by check properly drawn against such account and signed by such personnel as may be duly authorized by the state highway commission. Payment from the special account shall be deemed payments of and from the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 424; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-39.
Recording and reporting of payments.

Every insurance company which transacts the business of compensation insurance and every employer who is subject to the workmen’s compensation law, but who has not insured his liability, shall keep a record of all payments made under the provisions of this law, and of the time and manner of making such payments, and shall furnish such reports based upon these records to the workmen’s compensation commission as it may require by general order, upon forms approved by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-20; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-41.
Invalid agreements.

No agreement by an employee to pay any portion of premium paid by his employer or to contribute to a benefit fund or department maintained by such employer for the purpose of providing compensation or medical services and supplies as required by this chapter shall be valid. Any employer who makes a deduction for such purpose from the pay of any employee entitled to the benefits of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

No agreement by an employee to waive his right to compensation under this law shall be valid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-21; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-43.
Assignment and exemption from claims of creditors.

No assignment, release, or commutation of compensation or benefits due or payable under this chapter, except as provided by this chapter, shall be valid; and such compensation and benefits shall be exempt from all claims of creditors and from levy, execution, and attachment or other remedy for recovery or collection of a debt, which exemption may be waived. This section prevails over Sections 75-9-406 and 75-9-408 of Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code to the extent, if any, that these sections may otherwise be applicable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-22; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 23; Laws, 2001, ch. 495, § 23, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2002.

§ 71-3-45.
Compensation a lien against assets.

Any person entitled to compensation under the provisions of this chapter shall have a lien against the assets of the carrier or employer for such compensation without limit of amount, and shall, upon insolvency, bankruptcy, or reorganization in bankruptcy proceedings of the carrier or employer, or both, be entitled to preference and priority in the distribution of the assets of such carrier or employer, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-23; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-47.
Determination for claims for compensation.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the details of practice and procedure in the settlement and adjudication of claims shall be determined by rules of the commission, the text of which shall be published and be readily available to interested parties.

The commission shall have full power and authority to determine all questions relating to the payment of claims for compensation. The commission shall make or cause to be made such investigation as it deems necessary and, upon application of either party or upon its own initiative, shall order a hearing, shall make or deny an award, and shall file the same in its office.

Informal conferences and hearings in contested cases may be conducted by a duly designated representative of the commission. Upon the conclusion of any such hearing, the commission’s representative shall make or deny an award, and file the decision in the office of the commission. Immediately after such filing, a notice of decision shall be sent to all interested parties. This decision shall be final unless within twenty (20) days a request or petition for review by the full commission is filed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-24; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 18; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-49.
Enforcement of payment in default.

In case of default by the employer in the payment of any compensation due under an award for the period of thirty (30) days after payment is due and payable or, where the employer has failed to secure the payment of compensation to his employees as required, where there is such default in payment for a period of ten (10) days after same is due, any party in interest may file with the county clerk for the county in which the injury occurred or the county in which the employer has his principal place of business a certified copy of the decision of the commission awarding compensation or ending, diminishing or increasing compensation previously awarded, from which no appeal has been taken within the time allowed therefor or, if an appeal has been taken by an employer who has not complied with the provisions of Section 71-3-75, where he fails to deposit with the commission the amount of the award as security for its payment within ten (10) days after same is due and payable, and thereupon judgment must be entered in the circuit court by the clerk of such county in conformity therewith immediately upon the filing of such decision. If the payment in default be an installment, the commission may declare the entire award due and judgment may be entered in accordance with the provisions of this section. Such judgment shall be entered in the same manner, have the same effect, and be subject to the same proceedings as though rendered in a suit duly heard and determined by the circuit court, except that no appeal may be taken therefrom. The court shall vacate or modify such judgment to conform to any later award or decision of the commission upon presentation of a certified copy of such award or decision. The award may be so compromised by the commission as in its discretion may best serve the interest of the persons entitled to receive the compensation or benefits. Neither the commission nor any party in interest shall be required to pay any fee to any public officer for filing or recording any paper or instrument or for issuing a transcript of any judgment executed in pursuance of this section.

In case of default by a self-insurer in payment of any compensation due under an award where the default is due to the insolvency of the self-insurer, the claimant may file a claim based on the award with the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Self-insurer Guaranty Association, pursuant to the rules and regulations of said association, as established and provided for in Sections 71-3-151 through 71-3-181.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-25; laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 25; Laws, 1988, ch. 554, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-51.
Court review of compensation award.

The final award of the commission shall be conclusive and binding unless either party to the controversy shall, within thirty (30) days from the date of its filing in the office of the commission and notification to the parties, appeal therefrom to the Supreme Court.

Such appeal may be taken by filing notice of appeal with the commission, whereupon the commission shall under its certificate transmit to the Supreme Court all documents and papers on file in the matter, together with a transcript of the evidence, the findings, and award, which shall thereupon become the record of the cause. Appeals shall be considered only upon the record as made before the commission. The Supreme Court shall always be deemed open for hearing of such appeals. The Supreme Court shall review all questions of law and of fact. If no prejudicial error be found, the matter shall be affirmed and remanded to the commission for enforcement. If prejudicial error be found, the same shall be reversed and the Supreme Court shall enter such judgment or award as the commission should have entered. An appeal from the commission to the Supreme Court shall not act as a supersedeas unless the court shall so direct, and then upon such terms as such court shall direct.

No controversy shall be heard by the commission or an award of compensation made therein while the same matter is pending either before a federal court or in any court in this state.

Any award of compensation made by the Supreme Court shall bear the same interest and penalties as do other judgments awarded in circuit court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-26; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 20; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 27; Laws, 2011, ch. 389, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 71-3-53.
Continuing jurisdiction of the commission.

Upon its own initiative or upon the application of any party in interest on the ground of a change in conditions or because of a mistake in a determination of fact, the commission may, at any time prior to one (1) year after date of the last payment of compensation, whether or not a compensation order has been issued, or at any time prior to one (1) year after the rejection of a claim, review a compensation case, issue a new compensation order which may terminate, continue, reinstate, increase, or decrease such compensation, or award compensation. Such new order shall not affect any compensation previously paid, except that an award increasing the compensation rate may be made effective from the date of the injury; and if any part of the compensation due or to become due is unpaid, an award decreasing the compensation rate may be made effective from the date of the injury, and any payment made prior thereto in excess of such decreased rate shall be deducted from any unpaid compensation in such manner and by such method as may be determined by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-27; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1990.